Washington statutes.
RCW 43.70.320

Health professions account—Fees credited—Requirements for biennial budget request—Unappropriated funds.

(1) There is created in the state treasury an account to be known as the health professions account. All fees received by the department for health professions licenses, registration, certifications, renewals, compact privileges, or examinations and the civil penalties assessed and collected by the department under RCW 18.130.190 shall be forwarded to the state treasurer who shall credit such moneys to the health professions account.

(2) All expenses incurred in carrying out the health professions licensing activities of the department shall be paid from the account as authorized by legislative appropriation, except as provided in subsections (4) and (5) of this section. Any residue in the account shall be accumulated and shall not revert to the general fund at the end of the biennium.

(3) The secretary shall biennially prepare a budget request based on the anticipated costs of administering the health professions licensing activities of the department which shall include the estimated income from health professions fees.

(4) The fees received by the department from applicants for compact privilege under RCW 18.74.500 must be used for the purpose of meeting financial obligations imposed on the state as a result of this state's participation in the physical therapy licensure compact.

(5) The secretary shall, at the request of a board or commission as applicable, spend unappropriated funds in the health professions account that are allocated to the requesting board or commission to meet unanticipated costs of that board or commission when revenues exceed more than fifteen percent over the department's estimated six-year spending projections for the requesting board or commission. Unanticipated costs shall be limited to spending as authorized in subsection (3) of this section for anticipated costs.

[ 2019 c 220 s 1; 2017 c 108 s 7; 2015 c 70 s 39; 2008 c 134 s 16; 1993 c 492 s 411; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 18; 1991 c 3 s 299; 1985 c 57 s 29; 1983 c 168 s 5. Formerly RCW 43.24.072.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 220: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2019." [ 2019 c 220 s 3.]

Short title—Findings—Intent—References to Washington state liquor control board—Draft legislation—2015 c 70: See notes following RCW 66.08.012.

Finding—Intent—Severability—2008 c 134: See notes following RCW 18.130.020.

Findings—Intent—1993 c 492: See notes following RCW 43.20.050.

Short title—Savings—Reservation of legislative power—Effective dates—1993 c 492: See RCW 43.72.910 through 43.72.915.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Effective date—1985 c 57: See note following RCW 18.04.105.